Georgia statutes. TITLE 30 Handicapped Persons
CHAPTER 9 Georgia Achieving a Better Life Experience (ABLE)

Effective date. —

This chapter became effective May 3, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Former Chapter 9 was repealed by Ga. L. 1996, p. 804, § 5, effective January 1, 1997. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 30-9-1 through 30-9-8 (Article 1) and 30-9-20 through 30-9-24 (Article 2), and was based on Ga. L. 1996, p. 804, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 enactment of this chapter, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 193 (2016).

30-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Achieving a Better Life Experience (ABLE) Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-2.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the establishment of a qualified ABLE program in this state to encourage and assist the saving of private funds in tax-exempt accounts in order to pay for the qualified disability expenses of eligible individuals with disabilities.

It is also the intent of the legislature that any qualified ABLE program established in this state be implemented in a manner that is consistent with federal law authorizing the program and that maximizes program efficiency and effectiveness.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“ABLE account” means an account established and owned by an eligible individual pursuant to this chapter.

“Board” means the board of directors of the Georgia ABLE Program Corporation.

“Corporation” means the Georgia ABLE Program Corporation created pursuant to Code Section 30-9-4.

“Designated beneficiary” means the eligible individual who establishes an ABLE account or to whom an ABLE account is transferred.

“Eligible individual” means an eligible individual as defined in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Georgia ABLE program” or “program” means a qualified ABLE program established pursuant to this chapter.

“Internal Revenue Code” has the meaning provided in Code Section 48-1-2.

“Participation agreement” means the agreement between the board and an eligible individual participating in the Georgia ABLE Program Trust Fund or his or her fiduciary.

“Qualified ABLE Program” means a program established pursuant to Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Qualified disability expense” means an expense as defined in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Trust fund” means the Georgia ABLE Program Trust Fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-4.
Georgia ABLE Program Corporation created; board of directors and its membership; powers, duties, and administration.

There is created the Georgia ABLE Program Corporation, as a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality of the state, for purposes of establishing and administering the Georgia ABLE Program. The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities; the commissioner of community health; the state auditor; the director of the Office of Planning and Budget; the state revenue commissioner; the state treasurer; and three directors who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor, who shall include at least two persons who are persons with a disability, a family member of a person with a disability, or a disability advocacy professional. The board shall elect a chairperson from its membership. The state treasurer shall act as administrative officer of the board. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum, and the acts of the majority shall be the acts of the board.

Members of the board who are state officials or employees shall receive no compensation for their service on the board but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties as members of the board. Any members of the board who are not state officials or employees shall receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 for each day such member is in attendance at a meeting of the board. Expense allowances and other costs authorized in this paragraph shall be paid from moneys in the trust fund.

The board shall have the authority necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter and the purposes and objectives of the trust fund, including, but not limited to, the authority to:

Have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure; bring and defend actions; make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; and make and amend bylaws;

Adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement this chapter, subject to applicable federal laws and regulations;

Contract for necessary goods and services; employ necessary personnel; engage the services of consultants and other qualified persons and entities for administrative and technical assistance in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter; and contract with state or federal departments or agencies, upon such terms, for such consideration, and for such purposes as it deems advisable;

Solicit and accept gifts, including bequests or other testamentary gifts made by will, trust, or other disposition grants, loans, and other funds or aid from any endowment or other public or private source or participate in any other way in any federal, state, or local governmental program in carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

Define the terms and conditions under which payments may be withdrawn or refunded from an ABLE account or the trust fund established under this chapter and impose reasonable charges for a withdrawal or refund;

Regulate the receipt of contributions or payments to the trust fund;

Require and collect fees and charges to cover the reasonable costs of administering ABLE accounts and impose a 10 percent penalty on the earnings portion included within a withdrawal of funds for nonqualified disability expenses or for entering into a participation agreement on a fraudulent basis;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the property, assets, and activities of the trust fund or the corporation;

Establish other policies, procedures, and criteria and perform such other acts as necessary or appropriate to implement and administer this chapter; and

Authorize the state treasurer to carry out any or all of the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter for efficient and effective administration of the program and trust fund.

The corporation is assigned to the Department of Administrative Services for administrative purposes only.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-5.
Georgia ABLE Program established for participants to make contributions to accounts for purpose of meeting qualified disability expenses of designated beneficiary.

The board shall be authorized to establish a Georgia ABLE Program under which a person may make contributions for a taxable year, for the benefit of an eligible individual, to an ABLE account established for the purpose of meeting the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the ABLE account. Any such program shall be administered by the corporation. Contributions and investment earnings on the contributions may be used for any qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary. Only one ABLE account may be established for any eligible individual.

In addition to or in lieu of establishing a Georgia ABLE Program pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the corporation may:

Enter into an agreement with another state which allows the residents of such state to participate under the Georgia ABLE Program;

Enter into an agreement with one or more states or a consortium of states that has a qualified ABLE program to allow residents of this state to participate in the qualified ABLE program of such other state, states, or consortium; or

Facilitate or otherwise provide access to allow residents of this state to participate in qualified ABLE programs operated by other states.

If a Georgia ABLE Program is established pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall continue in existence until terminated by law. If the state determines that the program is financially infeasible, the state may terminate the program. Upon termination, amounts in the trust fund held for each designated beneficiary shall be returned in accordance with the participation agreement.

The state pledges to the designated beneficiaries that the state will not limit or alter their rights under this Code section which are vested in the Georgia ABLE Program until the program’s obligations are met and discharged. However, this subsection shall not preclude such limitation or alteration if adequate provision is made by law for the protection of the designated beneficiaries pursuant to the obligations of the corporation and does not preclude termination of the program pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-6.
Duties of board with respect to operating a Georgia ABLE Program.

If the board establishes a Georgia ABLE Program pursuant to Code Section 30-9-5, the board shall:

Establish, implement, and maintain the program as a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code;

Provide for the marketing of the program and develop and provide information to eligible individuals and their families necessary to establish and maintain an ABLE account; and

Make participation agreements and ABLE accounts available to eligible individuals.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-7.
Terms and conditions of participation agreements.

Each participation agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall include the following terms and conditions:

The participation agreement shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the state;

Participation in the Georgia ABLE Program does not guarantee that sufficient funds will be available to cover all qualified disability expenses for any designated beneficiary and does not guarantee the receipt or continuation of any product or service for the designated beneficiary;

The establishment of an ABLE account in violation of federal law is prohibited;

Contributions in excess of the limitations set forth in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code are prohibited;

The state is a creditor of ABLE accounts as, and to the extent, set forth in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Material misrepresentations by a party to the participation agreement, other than the Georgia ABLE Program Corporation, in the application for the participation agreement or in any communication with the Georgia ABLE Program Corporation regarding the Georgia ABLE Program may result in the involuntary liquidation of the ABLE account. If an account is involuntarily liquidated, the designated beneficiary is entitled to a refund, subject to any fees or penalties provided by the participation agreement and the Internal Revenue Code.

A participation agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter may include terms and conditions specifying:

The requirements and applicable restrictions for opening an ABLE account;

The eligibility requirements for a party to the participation agreement and the rights of the party;

The requirements and applicable restrictions for making contributions to an ABLE account;

The requirements and applicable restrictions for directing the investment of the contributions or balance of the ABLE account;

The administrative fee and other fees and penalties applicable to an ABLE account;

The terms and conditions under which an ABLE account or a participation agreement may be modified, transferred, or terminated; and

Any other terms and conditions that the board deems necessary or appropriate, including without limitation those necessary to conform the participation agreement with the requirements of Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws.

A participation agreement may be amended throughout its term for purposes that include, but are not limited to, allowing a participant to increase or decrease the level of participation and to change designated beneficiaries and other matters authorized by this Code section and Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-8.
ABLE Program Trust Fund created; administration of funds.

The board shall be authorized to create the Georgia ABLE Program Trust Fund. The trust fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall credit to the trust fund all amounts transferred to such fund. The trust fund shall consist of money remitted in accordance with participation agreements and shall receive and hold all payments, contributions, and deposits intended for it as well as gifts, bequests, endowments, grants and any other public or private source of funds, and all earnings on the fund until disbursed as provided under this Code section. The amounts on deposit in the trust fund shall not constitute property of the state. Amounts on deposit in the trust fund shall not be commingled with state funds, and the state shall have no claim to or interest in such funds other than the amount of reasonable fees and charges assessed to cover administration costs. Participation agreements or any other contract entered into by or on behalf of the trust fund shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the state, and no account contributor shall be entitled to any amounts except for those amounts on deposit in or accrued to the account of such contributor.

The trust fund shall continue in existence so long as it holds any funds belonging to an account contributor or otherwise has any obligations to any person or entity until its existence is terminated by law and remaining assets on deposit in the trust fund are returned to designated beneficiaries or other eligible persons pursuant to the terms of the participation agreement or transferred to the state in accordance with unclaimed property laws.

The official location of the trust fund shall be the Office of the State Treasurer, and unless otherwise authorized by the board, the facilities of the Office of the State Treasurer shall be used and employed in the administration of the fund, including without limitation the keeping of records, the management of bank accounts and other investments, the transfer of funds, and the safekeeping of securities evidencing investments. These functions may be administered pursuant to a management agreement with a qualified entity or entities.

Payments received by the board on behalf of designated beneficiaries from account contributors, other payors, or any other source, public or private, shall be placed in the trust fund, and the board shall cause there to be maintained separate records and accounts for individual beneficiaries as may be required under Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws.

Account contributors shall only be permitted to contribute cash except as otherwise permitted under Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. The board shall establish appropriate safeguards against contributions to an ABLE account in excess of the limitations set forth in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code.

Earnings derived from investment of the contributions shall be considered to be held in trust in the same manner as contributions. Amounts on deposit in an ABLE account shall be available for administrative fees and expenses and penalties imposed by the board as delineated in the participation agreement.

The assets of the trust fund shall be preserved, invested, and expended solely pursuant to and for the purposes of this chapter and shall not be loaned or otherwise transferred or used by the state for any other purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-9.
Taxation by state pursuant to Code Section 48-7-27; exempt from taxation by political subdivisions.

The trust fund and ABLE account property and income shall be subject to taxation by the state only as provided by paragraph (10.1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 48-7-27 and shall not be subject to taxation by any of the state’s political subdivisions.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-10.
Comprehensive investment plan.

The board shall have authority to establish a comprehensive investment plan for the purposes of this chapter and to invest any funds of the trust fund through the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall invest the trust fund moneys pursuant to an investment policy adopted by the board. Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, the board, through the state treasurer, shall invest or cause to be invested amounts on deposit in the trust fund, including the program account, in a manner reasonable and appropriate to achieve the objectives of the corporation, exercising the discretion and care of a prudent person in similar circumstances with similar objectives. The board shall give due consideration to the risk of, expected rate of return of, term or maturity of, diversification of total investments of, liquidity of, and anticipated investments in and withdrawals from the trust fund.

The board may employ or contract with financial organizations, investment managers, evaluation services, or other such entities as determined by the board to be necessary for the effective and efficient investment, administration, and operation of the program. The board shall establish criteria for financial organizations, investment managers, evaluation services, or other such entities that act as contractors or consultants to the board. The board may contract, either directly or through such contractors or consultants, to provide such services as may be a part of the comprehensive investment plan or as may be deemed necessary or proper by the board, including without limitation providing consolidated billing, individual and collective record keeping and accounting, and asset purchase, control, and safekeeping. All contractors and consultants shall be selected by competitive solicitation, unless otherwise directed by the board.

All investments shall be marked clearly to indicate ownership by the corporation and, to the extent possible, shall be registered in the name of the corporation.

Subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions set forth in this Code section, the board may sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments of the corporation if the sale, assignment, or transfer has the majority approval of the entire board.

Members and employees of the board shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 10 of Title 45, relating to codes of ethics and conflicts of interest.

No account contributor or beneficiary shall directly or indirectly direct the investment of any account funds except as may be permitted under Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws.

The board may approve different investment plans and options to be offered to participants to the extent permitted under Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws and consistent with the objectives of this chapter, and the board may require the assistance of investment counseling before participation in different options.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-11.
Amounts in ABLE account not considered in determining eligibility for certain public assistance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state or local law or regulation that requires consideration of the financial circumstances of an applicant for local, state, or federal public assistance or a benefit provided under that law, the agency or entity making the determination of eligibility for such assistance or benefit may not consider the amount in the applicant’s ABLE account or in an applicant’s ABLE account established pursuant to an ABLE program in another state, including earnings on that amount, and any distribution for qualified disability expenses in determining the applicant’s eligibility to receive the amount of the assistance or benefit with respect to the period during which the individual maintains any such ABLE account.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-12.
Annual reports.

If the board creates the Georgia ABLE Program Trust Fund pursuant to Code Section 30-9-8, the board shall prepare or cause to be prepared an annual report setting forth in appropriate detail an accounting of the Georgia Able Trust Fund at the close of each fiscal year. Such report shall be submitted to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. In addition, the board shall make the report available to account contributors and designated beneficiaries in the trust fund upon written request and may charge a reasonable fee for such report. The accounts of the trust fund shall be subject to annual audits by the state auditor or his or her designee.

Statements shall be provided to each designated beneficiary at least four times each year within 30 days after the end of the quarterly period to which a statement relates. The statement shall identify the contributions made during the preceding quarter, the total contributions made to the account through that quarter, the value of the account on the last day of that quarter, distributions made during that quarter, and any other information that the state treasurer requires to be reported to the designated beneficiary.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-13.
Provision of public information and outreach.

The Department of Community Health, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Department of Human Services, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, and the Department of Education shall assist, cooperate, and coordinate with the corporation in the provision of public information and outreach for a board approved Qualified ABLE Program.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-14.
Death of designated beneficiary of ABLE Trust fund.

Upon the death of a designated beneficiary of a Georgia ABLE Trust Fund account, the Department of Community Health and the Medicaid program for another state may file a claim with the Georgia ABLE Program for the total amount of medical assistance provided for the designated beneficiary under the Medicaid program after the date of the establishment of the ABLE account, less any premiums paid by or on behalf of the designated beneficiary to a Medicaid buy-in program. Funds in the ABLE account of the deceased designated beneficiary must first be distributed for qualified disability expenses followed by distributions for the Medicaid claim authorized under this subsection. Any remaining amount shall be distributed as provided in the participation agreement.

The corporation shall assist and cooperate with the Department of Community Health and Medicaid programs in other states upon the death of a designated beneficiary of the trust fund by coordinating through the Department of Community Health with the information needed to accomplish the purpose and objective of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-15.
Assignment of ABLE account prohibited.

An ABLE account may not be assigned for the benefit of creditors, used as security or collateral for any loan, or otherwise subject to alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge. Except as provided in Code Section 30-9-14, moneys paid into or out of an ABLE account, and the income and assets of such account, are not liable to attachment, levy, garnishment, or legal process in this state in favor of any creditor of or claimant against any designated beneficiary or account contributor.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.

30-9-16.
Records not open to inspection by the general public; limited access.

The provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 notwithstanding, the following records, or portions thereof, shall not constitute public records and shall not be open to inspection by the general public:

Completed participation applications, executed participation agreements, and ABLE account numbers;

All wiring or automated clearing-house transfer of funds instructions regarding participation agreements;

ABLE account transactions, IP addresses used to initiate transactions, and analysis statements received or prepared by or for the corporation;

All bank routing and account numbers in the possession of the corporation and any record or document containing such numbers;

All proprietary computer software in the possession or under the control of the corporation; and

All security codes and procedures related to physical, electronic, or other access to any ABLE account or the trust fund, its systems, and its software.

For a period from the date of creation of the record until the end of the calendar quarter in which the record is created, the following records, or portions thereof, of the trust fund shall not constitute public records and shall not be open to inspection by the general public:

Investment trade tickets; and

Bank statements.

The restrictions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not apply to access:

Required by subpoena or other legal process of a court or administrative agency having competent jurisdiction in legal proceedings where the State of Georgia or the corporation is a party;

In prosecutions or other court actions to which the State of Georgia or the corporation is a party;

Given to federal or state regulatory or law enforcement agencies;

Given to any person or entity in connection with an ABLE account to which such person or entity is an account contributor or given to any person in connection with an ABLE account of which such person is a beneficiary; or

Given to the board or any member, employee, or contractor thereof for use and public disclosure in the ordinary performance of its duties pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

30-9-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 588, § 1/HB 768.